District of Columbia statutes.
1-132

Approval and ratification of Constitution.

No proposed Constitution for the State of New Columbia shall take effect as the Constitution of the State of New Columbia until approved by the Congress of the United States and ratified in a referendum by a majority of the registered qualified electors of the District of Columbia voting thereon.

June 24, 1987, D.C. Law 7-8, § 3, 34 DCR 3057
1981 Ed., § 1-113.1.